Nebraska, session 109, LB601.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB601 LB601
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-2101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2101 A new trial, after a verdict of conviction, may be granted,
on the application of the defendant, for any of the following grounds
affecting materially his or her substantial rights:
(1) Irregularity in the proceedings of the court, of the prosecuting
attorney, or of the witnesses for the state or in any order of the court
or abuse of discretion by which the defendant was prevented from having a
fair trial;
(2) Misconduct misconduct of the jury, of the prosecuting attorney,
or of the witnesses for the state;
(3) Accident accident or surprise which ordinary prudence could not
have guarded against;
(4) The the verdict is not sustained by sufficient evidence or is
contrary to law;
(5) Newly newly discovered evidence material for the defendant which
he or she could not with reasonable diligence have discovered and
produced at the trial;
(6) Newly newly discovered exculpatory DNA or similar forensic
testing evidence obtained under the DNA Testing Act; or
(7) Error error of law occurring at the trial.
Sec. 2. Original section 29-2101, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-